Massachusetts, session 194th, H1393.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled,
and by the authority of the same, as follows:
Chapter 118E of the general laws is amended by adding at the end thereof, the following
new section:
Section 83. MassHealth shall make graduate medical education payments for post-
graduate residency and other training in community-based primary care, behavioral health, and
other areas of physician or provider shortage in community-based healthcare settings in the
Commonwealth. The payments may support community-based training for other health
professionals, including but not limited to, family medicine nurse practitioners, dentists, and
dental hygienists. Eligible providers for said payments shall include community health centers.
MassHealth shall seek to obtain the maximum amount of federal reimbursement for said
payments. MassHealth shall promulgate and revise any rules or regulations necessary to
of 2

implement this provision within 180 days of enactment. MassHealth will prioritize placements at
community-based settings and organizations that serve a high public payer mix. MassHealth
shall consult with the Massachusetts League of Community Health Centers, Inc. regarding
implementation of this section.
of 2